Louisiana, session 2026, SB82.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:154.1(D) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§154.1. Length of school day, week, and year; requirements
* * *
D.(1) The minimum school week shall consist of five consecutive days
within a week, except for acknowledged legal holidays.
(2) The requirements of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection shall not apply
to either one of the following:
(a) Any school district that receives a performance score of A from the
state Department of Education.
(b) Any city, parish, or other local school system that participates in a
four day school week on or before December 31, 2025, may continue with the
four day school week.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-369 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 82
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bill to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.